Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Chapter 22

Public Pledges and Liens

9-22-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Perfection, Priority and Enforcement of Public Pledges and Liens Act.”

Acts 2001, ch. 290, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 290, § 4 provided that the enactment by that act shall apply to any transaction within its scope, even if the transaction was entered into or created before July 1, 2001. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the application of this chapter shall not affect the rights of holders of public obligations issued under the provisions of title 9, chapter 21, as amended, to the extent that their relative priorities were intended to be fixed by reference to any other law prior to May 22, 1991.

9-22-102. Intent.

It is the intent and purpose of this chapter to clarify the statutory framework governing the perfection, priority and enforcement of pledges and liens made or granted in connection with the issuance of public obligations, and to preserve the customary practices with respect to these matters that have developed in the state of Tennessee among issuers and purchasers of public obligations. This chapter provides a uniform and comprehensive statutory framework governing the perfection, priority and enforcement of pledges and liens created by certain state and local governments, governmental entities, agencies and instrumentalities in connection with their issuance of debt obligations, and specifies the extent to which the perfection, priority and enforcement of such pledges and liens are excluded from title 47, chapter 9. If any statute of this state, other than title 47, chapter 9, imposes or authorizes a pledge or lien relating to any public obligations, then that statute, any official action entered into or adopted pursuant thereto, and this chapter, to the extent not in conflict with the foregoing, shall in all respects govern the creation, perfection, priority and enforcement of such pledges and liens, and title 47, chapter 9, shall not govern such matters.

Acts 2001, ch. 290, § 1.

9-22-103. Chapter definitions.

In this chapter:

Except as provided in the following sentence, the term “collateral” means any revenues, operating income, fees, rents, tolls or other charges received or receivable by an issuer from any public works project or otherwise, rights to payment and other rights under agreements, rights to and receipts of tax collections and revenues, rights to and receipts of grants or contributions, any funds, moneys or accounts, and any other personal property that an issuer is authorized to pledge to or grant a lien on to secure the payment of a public obligation, excluding any “goods,” as such term is defined in § 47-9-102(a). In the case of public corporations incorporated under title 7, chapter 82 or chapter 86, the term “collateral” includes, in addition to the foregoing, all other property, real and personal, including “goods,” as such term is defined in § 47-9-102(a), comprising the systems owned and operated by such corporations;

“Interest rate agreement” means an interest rate swap or exchange agreement, an agreement establishing interest rate floors or ceilings, or both, and other interest rate hedging agreements that an issuer is authorized by statute to enter into;

“Issuer” means the state of Tennessee, authorities and agencies of the state of Tennessee and all political subdivisions and public instrumentalities of the state of Tennessee, including, without limitation: cities; towns; metropolitan governments; counties; authorities; districts; public corporations; authorities, agencies and instrumentalities of the foregoing; and other public entities. Notwithstanding the foregoing, for purposes of this chapter, the term “issuer” shall not include public corporations incorporated under title 7, chapter 53, or title 48, chapter 101, part 3;

“Official actions” means the actions, by statute, order, ordinance, charter, resolution, contract or other authorized means, by which an issuer provides for issuance of a public obligation; and

“Public obligation” means:

An agreement of an issuer to pay principal and any interest thereon, whether in the form of a contract to repay borrowed money, a lease, an installment purchase agreement or otherwise, and includes a share, participation or other interest in any such agreement; and

An agreement of an issuer to make payments, including termination or other non-periodic payments, pursuant to an interest rate agreement.

Acts 2001, ch. 290, § 1; 2004, ch. 589, §§ 6, 7.

9-22-104. Perfection of pledges or liens.

The grant of a pledge or the creation of a lien on collateral by an issuer, which grant or creation is otherwise authorized under Tennessee law, shall be valid and binding from the time that the pledge or lien is created or granted and shall inure to the benefit of the holder or holders of the public obligations with respect to which such pledge or lien was created or granted until the payment in full of the principal thereof and premium and interest thereon, and neither the official action nor any other instrument granting, creating, or giving notice of the pledge or lien need be publicly filed or recorded to preserve, protect or perfect the validity or priority of such pledge or lien.

Acts 2001, ch. 290, § 1.

9-22-105. Priority of pledges or liens.

Public obligations evidenced by multiple bonds, notes, certificates or other instruments of the same issue shall be equally and ratably secured, without priority by reason of number, date, date of sale, date of execution or date of delivery, by any pledge or lien created or granted on collateral to secure the payment thereof, unless otherwise provided by the official action authorizing such public obligations.

Any pledge or lien on collateral created or granted by an issuer shall be junior in priority to pledges, liens and other security interests created or granted prior to the date such pledge or lien is created or granted; provided, that an official action may provide for the issuance of additional public obligations on a parity with, or senior to, the public obligations authorized thereby.

Acts 2001, ch. 290, § 1.

9-22-106. Enforcement of pledges or liens.

The manner in which the holder or holders of public obligations may enforce the pledge or lien created by an issuer with respect thereto shall be governed by Tennessee law authorizing the creation of such pledge or lien, and, subject to such provisions of Tennessee law, the terms of the official action authorizing such public obligations.

Acts 2001, ch. 290, § 1.

9-22-107. Impairment of contract.

Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed in any way to alter the terms of any agreements made with the holders of any public obligations of an issuer or to authorize an issuer to alter the terms of any such public obligations, or to impair, or to authorize any issuer to impair, the rights and remedies of any creditors of any issuer.

Acts 2001, ch. 290, § 1.

9-22-108. Supplementary nature.

This chapter shall be in addition to and supplemental to all other laws of Tennessee; provided, that wherever the application of this chapter conflicts with the application of such other provisions, such other provisions shall prevail.

Acts 2001, ch. 290, § 1.